Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-187.06
Permit; governmental agencies; exempt.

Weighing and measuring devices used by governmental agencies shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 89-187.01 to 89-187.05.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 17.